Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB809.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A superintendent adopting a health curriculum under KRS 160.345 or a principal
complying with statutory program requirements or providing additional health
programming for students may submit a request for assistance to a local health
department. The local health department may agree to assist the district or school
with programming and resources to promote positive health outcomes and
prevent negative health impacts.
(2) The health department services may include the provision of one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Handwashing instruction for kindergarten through grade five (5);
(b) Dental health instruction for kindergarten through grade five (5);
(c) Healthy eating and physical activity instruction for grades two (2) through
six (6);
(d) Cooking and nutrition instruction in grades four (4) and five (5);
(e) Puberty and hygiene instruction that is not part of a program of human
sexuality governed by KRS 158.1415;
(f) Positive potential and choices programming in grade eight (8);
(g) Bullying and suicide prevention programming for grades six (6) through
twelve (12) in compliance with KRS 156.095;
(h) Tobacco, smoking, and vaping prevention programming for grades six (6)
through twelve (12) in compliance with KRS 158.149;
(i) Substance abuse prevention programming aligned to academic standards
adopted under KRS 158.6453(18)(b); or
(j) Any other instruction or program to promote positive health outcomes or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/16/2025 2:25 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1532
prevent negative health impacts for students.
(3) Instruction and programming provided through a health department partnership
shall be subject to the same curricular requirements under KRS 160.345 and any
other statute or administrative regulation governing the operation of public
schools.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/16/2025 2:25 PM Jacketed